Montana, session 2025, LC1967.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Voter registration incentives prohibited -- penalty. (1) (a) An
employer may not compensate, either directly or indirectly, an employee for the act of registering to vote or for
assisting another individual to register to vote.
(b) The restriction under subsection (1)(a) includes offering or providing any form of compensation,
including monetary payment, bonuses, or other benefits, to an employee in exchange for registering to vote.
(c) The restriction under subsection (1)(a) also includes offering or providing any form of
compensation, including monetary payment, bonuses, or other benefits, to an employee in exchange for the
employee helping another individual to register to vote.
(d) The restriction under subsection (1)(a) does not include situations in which an employer offers
paid time off or other leave time to employees to allow them to vote in an election.
(2) An employer violating the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and on
conviction shall be punished by a fine in any sum not exceeding $1,000 for each offense.
(3) Nothing in this section may be construed to prevent employees from freely exercising their right
to vote, registering to vote, or engaging in any other lawful activity related to the electoral process. Employees
shall retain the right to participate in political activities outside of the work environment and without interference
from their employer.
(4) As used in this section, the following definitions apply:
(a) "Employee" means a person who may be permitted, required, or directed by an employer as
defined in subsection (4)(b) in consideration of direct or indirect gain or profit to engage in any employment.
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC1967.1
(b) "Employer" means an individual, partnership, association, corporation, legal representative,
trustee, receiver, and trustee in bankruptcy and any common carrier by rail, motor, water, air, or express
company doing business in or operating within the state.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an
integral part of Title 39, chapter 2, part 3, and the provisions of Title 39, chapter 2, part 3, apply to [section 1].

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Severability. If a part of [this act] is invalid, all valid parts that are
severable from the invalid part remain in effect. If a part of [this act] is invalid in one or more of its applications,
the part remains in effect in all valid applications that are severable from the invalid applications.

NEW SECTION. Section 4. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – ****